Utah statutes.
19-9-107.   Fees.

Fees for the treatment, disposal, and storage of hazardous waste at facilities operated by, or under subcontract with the authority shall be set by the authority based upon the following considerations:

(1)  the quantity of hazardous waste processed;

(2)  the difficulty encountered in the treatment, disposal or storage of such waste;

(3)  the maintenance expense and the expense of other legal obligations incurred pursuant to post-closure monitoring and liability requirements related to the long-term disposal or storage;

(4)  the operation and maintenance expense incident to the facility and to the debt retirement obligations of the authority; and

(5)  any other considerations that the authority considers relevant.

